data/hungarian.aff
SFX O   0    néktok       .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ACC]
SFX O   0    néktok       .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_PL_1]{+[NOM]} UŮmŇ
SFX O   0    nékotok      .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ACC]
SFX O   0    nékotok      .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_PL_1]{+[NOM]} UŮmŇ
SFX O   0    nékom        .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_SG_1]{+[NOM]} UŮmŇ
SFX O   0    nékom        .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_SG_1]+[ACC]
SFX O   0    nékod        .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_SG_2]{+[NOM]} UŮmŇ
SFX O   0    nékod        .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ACC]
SFX O   0    nékja        .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_SG_3]{+[NOM]} UŇŐĎ
SFX O   0    néka         .hat                      [nék_WISH_noun_poss]+[POSS_SG_3]{+[NOM]} UŇŐĎ
SFX O   0    nék          [aeioöuü]t                [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    nék          [^tk]                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    nátok        [aeioöuü]t                [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    nátok        [^tk]                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    nánk         [aeioöuü]t                [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    nánk         [^tk]                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    nának        [aeioöuü]t                [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    nának        [^tk]                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    nál          [aeioöuü]t                [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    nál          [^tk]                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    nunk         [aeioöuü]t                [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    nunk         [^tk]                     [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    notok        [aeioöuü]t                [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    notok        [^tk]                     [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    nom          [aeioöuü]t                [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    nom          [^tk]                     [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    nod          [aeioöuü]t                [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    nod          [^tk]                     [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    niuk         [aeioöuü]t                [INF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    niuk         [^tk]                     [INF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    niok         [aeioöuü]t                [INF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    niok         [^tk]                     [INF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    nia          [aeioöuü]t                [INF_SG_3]
SFX O   0    nia          [^tk]                     [INF_SG_3]
SFX O   0    ni           [aeioöuü]t                [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
SFX O   0    ni           [^tk]                     [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
SFX O   0    nak          [aeioöuü]t                [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    nak          [^tk]                     [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    na           [aeioöuü]t                [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX O   0    na           [^tk]                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX O   0    jál          [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    junk         [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    jon          [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX O   0    jatok        [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    janak        [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    jak          [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    j            [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    asz          rr                        [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    asz          [lnrz]d                   [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    asz          [ln]l                     [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    asz          [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    asz          [jdmn]z                   [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    asz          [gn]g                     [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anék         rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anék         [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anék         [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anék         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anék         [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anék         [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anátok       rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anátok       [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anátok       [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anátok       [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anátok       [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anátok       [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anánk        rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anánk        [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anánk        [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anánk        [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anánk        [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anánk        [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anának       rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    anának       [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    anának       [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    anának       [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    anának       [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    anának       [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    anál         rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anál         [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anál         [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anál         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anál         [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anál         [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anunk        rr                        [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anunk        [lnrz]d                   [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anunk        [ln]l                     [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anunk        [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anunk        [jdmn]z                   [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anunk        [gn]g                     [INF_PL_1]
SFX O   0    anotok       rr                        [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anotok       [lnrz]d                   [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anotok       [ln]l                     [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anotok       [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anotok       [jdmn]z                   [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anotok       [gn]g                     [INF_PL_2]
SFX O   0    anom         rr                        [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anom         [lnrz]d                   [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anom         [ln]l                     [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anom         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anom         [jdmn]z                   [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anom         [gn]g                     [INF_SG_1]
SFX O   0    anod         rr                        [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anod         [lnrz]d                   [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anod         [ln]l                     [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anod         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anod         [jdmn]z                   [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    anod         [gn]g                     [INF_SG_2]
SFX O   0    aniuk        rr                        [INF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    aniuk        [lnrz]d                   [INF_PL_3]
SFX O   0    aniuk        [ln]l                     [INF_PL_3]
