data/hungarian.dic
átall/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
államvizsgázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zubog/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zagyvál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vájat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
viszonoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vigadozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vakar/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ugrik/ŠXOŤ	ugrik[vrb]+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
tárolódik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tudománytalanít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
torol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤdX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tisztíttat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tarkáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
takarmányoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sápad/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szán/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sztornóz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szippogat/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szarval/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szabálytalankodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
storníroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
snúroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
satíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
rándítgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
roskadozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ringatódzik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
rekontráz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ragad/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
páhol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
prostituál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
porosodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pitypalattyol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pelenkáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pang/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
orrontat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
okosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nyulászik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nyihog/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nagyhangúskodik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
mustrálgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
monopolizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
mechanizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
makacskodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lázít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lombosodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
legitimál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lakatol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kézimunkázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kurkász/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
krepál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kornyikál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kontrolál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
komiszkodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kitárulkozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kattant/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kapat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kajakozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
javadalmaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
irdal/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
indikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
húroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hálál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
horzsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hasal/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hadovál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
gornyadoz/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
futtat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
fokoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
fasizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ellentmond/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
dorongol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
delirál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csábul/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csapódik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bátorodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
boronál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bemószerol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
aprehendál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
akadékoskodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
